Washington statutes.
RCW 9.94.045

Narcotic drugs or controlled substances—Possession by person not a prisoner—Penalty.

A person, other than a person serving a sentence in a penal institution of this state, is guilty of possession of contraband on the premises of a state correctional institution in the second degree if, without authorization to do so, the person knowingly possesses or has under his or her control any narcotic drug or controlled substance, as defined in chapter 69.50 RCW, on or in the buildings, grounds, or any other real property subject to the care, control, or supervision of a state correctional institution.

Possession of contraband on the premises of a state correctional institution in the second degree is a class C felony.

[ 1979 c 121 s 4.]